Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 430.220 is amended to read:
430.220. (1) The Governor shall appoint a Director of  the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission
who shall  serve at the pleasure of the Governor and be responsible for the dissemination and im-
plementation of the  Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission’s policies and the performance of the
commission’s duties, functions and powers.
(2) The director  shall be paid a salary as provided by law or, if not so provided, as prescribed
by the Governor.
(3) Subject to ORS chapter 240, the director shall  appoint all employees of the commission,
prescribe their duties and fix their compensation.
(4) The director  has all powers necessary to effectively and expeditiously carry out the duties,
functions and powers of the commission , including the authority to:
(a) Enter into contracts;
(b) Apply for and receive gifts and grants from any public or private source; and
(c) Award grants from funds appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly to the commission
or from funds otherwise available from any other source .
(5) The director shall enter into agreements with participating state  agencies for the sharing
of information as necessary to carry out the duties of the commission. The  agreements shall ensure
the confidentiality of all information that is protected from disclosure by state and federal laws.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 430.221 is amended to read:
430.221. (1) As used in this section and ORS 430.220 and 430.223:
(a) “Participating state agency” means the Department of Corrections, the Department of  Hu-
man Services, the Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Education,  the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission, the Oregon State Police, the Oregon Youth Authority, the  Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services, the Housing and Community Services Department, the  Youth Devel-
opment Division, the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the Oregon State Lottery
Commission, the Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs or
any state agency that administers or funds  [ alcohol or drug abuse prevention or treatment services ]
substance use prevention, substance use disorder treatment or recovery support services .
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 1
(b) “Provider” means any person that is licensed by the Oregon Health Authority to provide
[alcohol or drug  abuse prevention or treatment services ] substance use prevention, substance use
disorder treatment or recovery support services .
(2) There is created the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, which is  charged with improving
[the effectiveness and efficiency of  state and local alcohol and drug abuse prevention and treatment
services ] access to evidence-based, evidence-informed and culturally informed  substance use
prevention, substance use disorder treatment and recovery support services by establishing
state policies and holding participating state agencies accountable for carrying out those
policies.
(3) The membership of the commission consists of:
(a) [ No more than 17 ] Twenty-one members appointed by the  Governor, subject to confirmation
by the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and  171.565 and appointed, as the Governor
deems practicable, to ensure representation from [ stakeholders directly impacted by the work of the
commission] every region of  the state and from individuals with lived experience with sub-
stance use disorder and their family members , as follows:
[(A) At least 75 percent of the members appointed by the Governor must  be representatives of the
following public health and health care stakeholder groups: ]
[(i) County commissioners, managers and administrators; ]
[(ii) Indian tribes; ]
[(iii) The following providers of addiction prevention and recovery services: ]
[(I) Treatment providers employed by an outpatient addiction treatment program; ]
[(II) Directors of inpatient addiction treatment centers; ]
[(III) Addiction treatment providers who are culturally competent to serve  specific cultural or eth-
nic populations; ]
[(IV) Certified prevention specialists; ]
[(V) Certified addiction counselors; and ]
[(VI) Certified addiction recovery mentors; ]
[(iv) Alcohol or drug treatment researchers or epidemiologists; ]
[(v) The health insurance industry or hospitals; ]
[(vi) Consumers of addiction recovery  services who are in recovery and the family members of
consumers;]
[(vii) Experts in addiction medicine; ]
[(viii) Entities that provide housing to individuals who are in recovery; and ]
[(ix) Social service providers. ]
[(B) Up to 25 percent of the members appointed by the Governor  shall be representatives of one or
more of the following stakeholder groups: ]
[(i) District attorneys. ]
[(ii) County sheriffs. ]
[(iii) Chiefs of police. ]
[(iv) Criminal defense attorneys. ]
[(v) County community corrections agencies. ]
(A) One representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe;
(B) One county commissioner, manager or administrator;
(C) Nine health care providers who have substance use disorder expertise and  who, col-
lectively, have experience in the following settings:
(i) Outpatient care;
(ii) Inpatient care;
(iii) Emergency response;
(iv) Housing that is supportive to people who have a current diagnosis of a  substance use
disorder or are in recovery from a substance use disorder; and
(v) Peer support;
(D) One certified prevention specialist;
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 2
(E) One coordinated care organization representative;
(F) One representative of the criminal justice system, including a  county sheriff, chief
of police or community corrections director;
(G) One attorney who is a  district attorney, criminal defense attorney or assistant at-
torney general;
(H) One community mental health program representative;
(I) One health insurer representative;
(J) One county juvenile department director;
(K) One school administrator;
(L) One city representative; and
(M) One local public health administrator, as defined in ORS 431.003.
(b) Two members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the commission  as nonvoting mem-
bers of the commission, acting in an advisory capacity only and including:
(A) One member from among members of the Senate appointed by the President of the  Senate;
and
(B) One member from among members of the  House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives.
(c) A judge of a circuit court appointed to the commission as a nonvoting member by the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court.
[(d) The director of the behavioral health program of the Oregon Health Authority as a  nonvoting
member.]
[(e) A representative of a coordinated care organization appointed to the commission as a nonvoting
member by the Governor. ]
(d) Up to three representatives of different participating state agencies, including one
representative of a primarily youth-serving agency,  appointed to the commission as nonvot-
ing members by the Governor.
(4) The [ Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission ] Governor shall select one [ of its  members ]
member of the commission to serve  as chairperson and another to serve  as vice chairperson, for
such terms and with duties and powers necessary for  the performance of the functions of such of-
fices as the [ commission] Governor determines.
(5)(a) A majority of the voting  members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(b) If a member of the commission appointed by the Governor  is absent for more than two
consecutive scheduled meetings  of the commission, the Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy
Commission appointed under ORS 430.220 may  recommend to the Governor that the member be re-
placed.
(6) Official action of the commission requires the approval of a majority of a quorum.
(7) The commission may establish a steering committee  and subcommittees. These committees
may be continuing or temporary. A person  who is not a member of the commission may be appointed
by the commission to  serve on a subcommittee. The commission shall appoint subcommittee members
to ensure representation from all stakeholders directly impacted by the work of the commission.
(8) The term of office of each commission member appointed by the Governor is four years, but
a member serves at the pleasure  of the Governor. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective.
(9) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the commission. Subject  to
available funding, the commission may contract with a public or private entity to provide  staff
support.
(10) Members of the commission who are not members  of the Legislative Assembly are entitled
to compensation and expenses incurred by them in the  performance of their official duties in the
manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for compensation and expenses shall be
paid out of  funds appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority or funds appropriated to the com-
mission for purposes of the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 3
SECTION 3. Nothing in the amendments to ORS 430.221 by section 2 of  this 2025 Act af-
fects the term of office of any member of the Alcohol  and Drug Policy Commission appointed
prior to and serving on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 430.223 is amended to read:
430.223. (1) For purposes of  this section, “program” means a [ state, local or tribal alcohol and
drug abuse prevention and treatment program ] substance use prevention, substance  use disorder
treatment or recovery support services program that receives state  funds or state-
administered funds.
(2) The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission established under ORS 430.221 shall develop a
comprehensive [ addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery ] substance use prevention, substance
use disorder treatment and recovery support services  plan for this  state. The plan [ must] may
include, but is not limited to, recommendations regarding:
(a) Capacity, type and utilization of programs;
(b) Methods to assess the effectiveness and performance of programs;
(c) The best use of existing programs;
(d) Budget policy priorities for participating state agencies;
(e) Standards for licensing programs;
(f) Minimum standards for contracting for, providing and  coordinating [ alcohol and drug abuse
prevention and treatment services among programs that use federal,  private or state funds administered
by the state ] substance use prevention,  substance use disorder treatment and recovery sup-
port services ; [ and]
(g) The most effective and efficient use of participating state agency resources  to support pro-
grams; and
(h) Youth  substance use prevention and youth substance use disorder treatment and re-
covery strategies  to reduce substance use disorders among individuals who are up to 26 years
of age and their families .
(3) All participating state agencies shall:
(a) Meet with the commission on a quarterly basis , or  as requested by the commission,  to
review and report on each agency’s progress on implementing the plan; [ and]
(b) Report to the commission,  in the manner prescribed by the commission, each agency’s proc-
ess and outcome measures established under the plan ; and
(c) Provide notice to the commission at least 45 days before adopting any  rule relating
to substance  use prevention, substance use disorder treatment or recovery support
services.
(4) The commission shall review and update  the plan no later than July 1 of each even-numbered
year and shall [ produce and publish ] submit to the Governor and  to the appropriate committees
or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  a  report on the metrics and other indicators
of progress in achieving the goals of the plan.
(5) The commission may:
(a) Conduct studies related to the duties of the commission in collaboration with  other state
agencies;
(b) Apply for and receive gifts and grants for public and private sources; and
(c) Use funds received by the commission to carry out the purposes of ORS  430.220 and 430.221
and this section.
(6) All participating state agencies and local agencies shall assist the  commission in developing
the comprehensive [ addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery ] substance use prevention,  sub-
stance use disorder treatment and recovery support services  plan.
(7) The commission may adopt rules to carry out its duties under this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 430.270 is amended to read:
430.270. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall take such  means as it considers most effective
to bring to  the attention of the general public, employers, the professional community and partic-
ularly the youth of the state, the harmful effects to the individual and  society of the irresponsible
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 4
use of alcoholic beverages, controlled substances  and other chemicals, and substances with abuse
potential.
(2) The activities of the authority under this section may not be inconsistent with the  compre-
hensive [ addiction, prevention, treatment  and recovery ] substance use prevention, substance use
disorder treatment and recovery support  services plan developed by the Alcohol and Drug Pol-
icy Commission under ORS 430.223.
SECTION 6.  ORS 430.357 is amended to read:
430.357. (1) The  Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to implement ORS 430.338 to 430.380
and to establish minimum standards for alcohol and drug prevention and treatment programs in ac-
cordance with the  comprehensive [ addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery ] substance use
prevention, substance use disorder treatment and recovery support services plan developed
by the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission under ORS 430.223.
(2) All standards and guidelines adopted by the authority to  implement programs authorized
under ORS 430.338 to 430.380 shall be adopted as rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183  regardless of
whether they come within the definition of rule in ORS 183.310 (9).
SECTION 7.
 Section 6, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Opioid Settlement  Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Board is created in the
Oregon Health Authority for the purpose  of determining the allocation of funding from the Opioid
Settlement Prevention, Treatment and  Recovery Fund established in section 5 [ of this 2022 Act ],
chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022 . The board consists of:
(a) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) A policy advisor to the Governor;
(B) A representative of the Department of Justice;
(C) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority; and
(D) A representative of the Department of Human Services;
(b) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s designee;
(c) The chairperson of the Oversight and Accountability Council  established in ORS 430.388 or
the chairperson’s designee;
(d) The following members appointed by the Governor from a list of candidates provided by  the
Association of Oregon Counties and the League  of Oregon Cities or the successor organizations to
the Association of Oregon Counties and the League of Oregon Cities:
(A) An individual representing Clackamas, Washington or Multnomah County;
(B) An individual representing Clatsop, Columbia, Coos, Curry, Jackson, Josephine, Lane or
Yamhill County;
(C) An individual representing the City of Portland;
(D) An individual  representing a city with a population above 10,000 residents as of July 21,
2021;
(E) An individual representing a city with a population at or below 10,000  residents as of July
21, 2021; and
(F) A representative of the Oregon Coalition of Local Health Officials or its successor organ-
ization;
(e) The following members appointed by the Governor from a list of candidates provided by the
members described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection:
(A) A representative of a community mental health program;
(B) An  individual who has experienced a substance use disorder or a representative of an or-
ganization that advocates on behalf of individuals with substance use disorders; and
(C) An individual representing law enforcement, first responders  or jail commanders or wardens;
(f) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the  House of Repre-
sentatives, who shall be a nonvoting member of the board;
(g) A member of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate, who  shall be a nonvoting
member of the board; and
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 5
(h) The State Court Administrator or the  administrator’s designee, who shall be a nonvoting
member of the board.
(2) The Governor shall  select from the members described in subsection (1)(a), (b) and (c) of this
section one cochairperson to represent state entities, and the members described  in subsection (1)(d)
of this section shall select from one of their members a cochairperson to represent cities or counties.
(3) The term of each member  of the board who is not an ex officio member is four years, but a
member serves  at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Before the expiration of a member’s term,
the appointing authority shall appoint a  successor whose term begins on January 1 next following.
A member is eligible for reappointment.  If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) Decision-making by the  board shall be based on consensus and supported by at least a ma-
jority of the members. The board shall document all objections to board decisions.
(5) The board shall conduct at least four public meetings in  accordance with ORS [ 192.610 to
192.690] 192.610 to 192.705, which shall be publicized to facilitate attendance at  the meetings and
during which the board shall receive testimony and  input from the community. The board shall also
establish a  process for the public to provide written comments and proposals at each meeting of the
board.
(6) In determining the  allocation of moneys from the Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment
and Recovery Fund:
(a) No more than five percent of the moneys may be spent on  administering the board and the
fund.
(b) A portion of the moneys shall  be allocated toward a unified and evidence-based state system
for collecting, analyzing and publishing data about the  availability and efficacy of substance use
prevention, treatment and recovery services statewide.
(c) Moneys remaining after allocations in accordance with  paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sub-
section shall be allocated for funding  statewide and regional programs identified in the Distributor
Settlement Agreement, the  Janssen Settlement Agreement and any other judgment or settlement
described in section 5 (1)(c) [ of this 2022 Act ], chapter 63, Oregon  Laws 2022 , including but not
limited to:
(A) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to treat  opioid use disor-
ders and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(B) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed  strategies to support individuals in
recovery from opioid use disorders and any co-occurring  substance use disorders or mental health
conditions;
(C) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to provide  connections to
care for individuals who have or are at risk of developing opioid use disorders and any  co-occurring
substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(D) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address  the needs of
individuals with opioid use disorders  and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health
conditions  and  who are involved in, at risk of becoming involved in, or in transition from, the
criminal justice system;
(E) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address the needs  of
pregnant or parenting women  with opioid use disorders and any co-occurring substance use disor-
ders or mental health conditions, and the needs  of their families, including babies with neonatal
abstinence syndrome;
(F) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts  to pre-
vent over-prescribing of opioids and ensure appropriate prescribing and dispensing of opioids;
(G) Programs that use evidence-based  or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts to dis-
courage or prevent misuse of opioids;
(H) Programs that use  evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts to pre-
vent or reduce overdose deaths or other opioid-related harms;
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 6
(I) Programs to educate law enforcement or  other first responders regarding appropriate prac-
tices and precautions when dealing with users of fentanyl or other opioids;
(J) Programs to provide wellness and support services for first responders  and others who ex-
perience secondary trauma associated with opioid-related emergency events;
(K) Programs to support efforts to provide leadership, planning, coordination, facilitation,
training and technical assistance to abate the opioid epidemic through activities, programs  or
strategies; or
(L) Funding to support opioid abatement research.
(d) The board shall be guided and informed by:
(A) The comprehensive [ addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery ] substance use pre-
vention, substance use disorder treatment and recovery support services plan developed  by
the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission in accordance with ORS 430.223;
(B) The board’s ongoing evaluation of the efficacy of the funding allocations;
(C) Evidence-based and evidence-informed strategies and best practices;
(D) Input the board receives from the public;
(E) Equity considerations for underserved populations; and
(F) The terms of the settlement agreements.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the board.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 430.389, as amended by section 68, chapter 70, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
430.389. (1) The Oversight and  Accountability Council shall approve grants and funding provided
by the Oregon  Health Authority in accordance with this section to implement Behavioral Health
Resource Networks and increase access to community care. A Behavioral Health Resource  Network
is an entity or collection of entities that individually or jointly provide some or  all of the services
described in subsection (2)(e) of this section.
(2)(a) The authority shall establish an equitable:
(A) Process for applying for grants  and funding by agencies or organizations, whether govern-
ment or community based, to establish Behavioral Health Resource  Networks for the purposes of
immediately screening the acute needs of individuals with substance use, including those  who also
have a mental  illness, and assessing and addressing any ongoing needs through ongoing case man-
agement, harm reduction, treatment, housing and linkage to other care and services.
(B) Evaluation process to  assess the effectiveness of Behavioral Health Resource Networks that
receive grants or funding.
(b) Recipients of grants or funding  must be licensed, certified or credentialed by the state, in-
cluding certification under ORS 743A.168 (9), or meet criteria prescribed by rule by the  authority
under ORS 430.390. A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the  grant
or funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(c) The council and the authority shall ensure that  residents of each county have access to all
of the services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(d) Applicants for grants and funding may apply individually or jointly with  other network par-
ticipants to provide services in one or more counties.
(e) A network must have the capacity to provide the  following services and any other services
specified by the authority by rule but no individual participant in a  network is required to provide
all of the services:
(A) Screening by certified addiction peer support or wellness specialists or other  qualified per-
sons designated  by the council to determine a client’s need for immediate medical or other treatment
to determine what acute care is needed and  where it can be best provided, identify other needs and
link the client to other appropriate local or statewide services, including  treatment for substance
use and coexisting health  problems, housing, employment, training and child care. Networks shall
provide this service 24 hours a day, seven days a week, every calendar day of  the year through a
telephone line or other means. Networks may rely  on the statewide telephone hotline established
by the  authority under ORS 430.391 for telephone screenings during nonbusiness hours such as
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 7
evenings, weekends and holidays. Notwithstanding paragraph (c)  of this subsection, only one
grantee in each network within each county is required to provide the screenings described  in this
subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health needs assessment, including a  substance use screening by
a certified alcohol  and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment professional. The
assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual intervention planning, case management and connection to services. If, after  the
completion of a screening, a client indicates a desire to address some or all of the identified needs,
a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan  must
address the client’s  need for substance use treatment, coexisting health problems, housing, employ-
ment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing  peer counseling and support from screening and assessment through implementation
of individual intervention plans as well as  peer outreach workers to engage directly with
marginalized community members who could potentially benefit from the network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction services and information and education about harm reduction services.
(G) Low-barrier substance use treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use.
(f) If an applicant  for a grant or funding under this subsection is unable to provide all of the
services described in  paragraph (e) of this subsection, the applicant may identify how the applicant
intends to partner with other entities to provide the services,  and the authority and the council may
facilitate collaboration among applicants.
(g) All services provided through  the networks must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed,
culturally specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental. The goal shall be
to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other social determinants of health.
(h) The networks must be adequately staffed to address the needs of  people with substance use
within their regions as prescribed by the authority by rule, including, at a minimum, at  least one
person in each of the following categories:
(A) Alcohol and drug counselor certified by the authority or other credentialed addiction treat-
ment professional;
(B) Case manager;
(C) Addiction peer support specialist certified by the authority;
(D) Addiction peer wellness specialist certified by the authority;
(E) Recovery  mentor, certified by the Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of
Oregon or its successor organization; and
(F) Youth support specialist certified by the authority.
(i) Verification of a screening by a certified addiction peer  support specialist, wellness specialist
or other person in accordance with paragraph  (e)(A) of this subsection shall promptly be provided
to the client by the entity conducting the screening. If the client executes a valid release of  infor-
mation, the entity shall provide verification of the screening to  the authority or a contractor of the
authority and the authority or the authority’s contractor shall forward  the verification to any entity
the client has authorized to receive the verification.
(3)(a) If moneys remain in the Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund after the council
has committed grants and funding to establish behavioral health resource  networks serving every
county in this state, the council shall authorize grants and  funding to other agencies or organiza-
tions, whether government or community based, and to the nine federally recognized tribes  in this
state and service providers that are affiliated with the nine federally recognized tribes  in this state
to increase access to one or more of the following:
(A) Low-barrier substance use treatment that  is evidence-informed, trauma-informed, culturally
specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental;
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 8
(B) Peer support and recovery services;
(C) Transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with substance use;
(D) Harm reduction interventions including, but  not limited to, overdose prevention education,
access to short-acting opioid antagonists, as defined  in ORS 689.800, and sterile syringes and
stimulant-specific drug education and outreach; or
(E) Incentives and supports  to expand the behavioral health workforce to support the services
delivered by behavioral health resource networks  and entities receiving grants or funding under this
subsection.
(b) A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant or funding  to
supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(4) In awarding grants and  funding under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the council
shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available regional data related to the  substance use treatment needs and the access
to culturally specific and linguistically responsive services in communities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of  residents of this state for services, supports and treatment at all ages.
(5) The council shall  require any government entity that applies for a grant to specify in the
application details regarding subgrantees and how the government entity will  fund culturally spe-
cific  organizations  and culturally specific services. A government entity receiving a grant must
make an explicit commitment not to supplant or decrease any existing  funding used to provide ser-
vices funded by the grant.
(6) In determining grants and funding to be  awarded, the council may consult the comprehensive
[addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery ] substance use prevention,  substance use disorder
treatment and recovery support services plan established by the Alcohol and Drug Policy Com-
mission under ORS 430.223 and the advice of  any other group, agency, organization or individual
that desires to provide advice to the council that is consistent with the terms of this section.
(7) Services provided by grantees, including services provided by a Behavioral Health  Resource
Network, shall be free of charge to the clients receiving the services. Grantees in each  network
shall seek reimbursement from  insurance issuers, the medical assistance program or any other third
party responsible for the cost of services provided to a  client and grants and funding provided by
the council or the authority under this section may be used  for copayments, deductibles or other
out-of-pocket costs incurred by the client for the services.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not require the medical  assistance program to reimburse
the cost of services for which another third  party is responsible in violation of 42 U.S.C. 1396a(25).
SECTION 9.
 ORS 657.665 is amended to read:
657.665. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2)  to (5) of this section, all information in the
records of the Employment  Department pertaining to the administration of the unemployment in-
surance, employment service and workforce and labor market information programs:
(a) Is confidential and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of the  Employment
Department in administering  the unemployment insurance, employment service and workforce and
labor market information programs in Oregon.
(b) May not be used in any court action or in any proceeding pending  in the court unless the
director or the state is a  party to the action or proceeding or unless the proceeding concerns the
establishment, enforcement or modification of a support obligation and support  services are being
provided by the Division of Child Support or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080.
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The Employment Department shall disclose information:
(a) To any claimant or legal representative, at a hearing before an administrative law  judge, to
the extent necessary for the proper presentation of an unemployment insurance claim.
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 9
(b) Upon request to the United States  Secretary of Labor. The Employment Department shall
disclose the information in a form and containing  the information that the United States Secretary
of Labor may require. The information disclosed is confidential and may not  be used for any other
purpose.
(c) Pursuant  to section 303(a)(7) of the Social Security Act, upon request to any agency of the
United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance  through public em-
ployment. Under this paragraph, the Employment Department  shall disclose the name, address, or-
dinary occupation and employment status of each recipient  of unemployment insurance benefits and
a statement of the recipient’s  right to further benefits under this chapter. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose.
(d) Pursuant to section 303(c)(1) of the Social Security  Act, to the Railroad Retirement Board.
Under this paragraph, the Employment  Department shall disclose unemployment insurance records.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other  purpose. The costs of
disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the board.
(e) Pursuant to section 303(d) of the Social Security Act, upon request to officers and employees
of the United States Department of Agriculture  and to officers or employees of any state Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibil-
ity for or the amount of supplemental nutrition assistance.  The information disclosed is confidential
and may not be used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph
shall be paid by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(f) Pursuant to section 303(e)(1)  and (2)(A)(ii) of the Social Security Act, to state or local child
support enforcement  agencies enforcing child support obligations under Title IV-D of the Social Se-
curity Act for the purposes  of establishing child support obligations, locating individuals owing child
support obligations and collecting child support obligations from those  individuals. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used  for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing infor-
mation under this paragraph shall be paid by the child support enforcement agency.
(g) Pursuant to sections 303(f) and 1137 of the Social  Security Act, to agencies participating in
the income and eligibility verification system for the purpose of verifying  an individual’s eligibility
for benefits, or the amount of benefits, under unemployment insurance, temporary  assistance for
needy families, Medicaid, the  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, Supplemental Security
Income, child support enforcement or Social Security programs. The information disclosed is  confi-
dential and may not be used  for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this
paragraph shall be paid by the requesting agency.
(h) Pursuant to section 303(h) of the Social Security Act and section 3304(a)(16)(B) of the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, to the United States Department  of Health and Human Services National
Directory of New Hires. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be used for any other
purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by  the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(i) Pursuant to section 303(i) of the Social  Security Act, to officers and employees of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development and to representatives of a public  housing
agency for the purpose of  determining an individual’s eligibility for benefits, or the amount of ben-
efits, under a housing assistance program of the United States Department of Housing  and Urban
Development. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose.
The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid  by the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development or the public housing agency.
(j) Pursuant to regulations of the United States Secretary  of Health and Human Services issued
under section  3304(a)(16)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and except as required by sec-
tion 303 of the Social Security Act, to the state, a  political subdivision or a federally recognized
Indian tribe that has signed an agreement  with the Department of Human Services to administer
Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the purpose of determining an individual’s  eligi-
bility for assistance, or the amount of assistance, under a program funded under Part A of Title  IV
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 10
of the  Social Security Act. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any
other purpose.
(k) Upon request,  to the United States Attorney’s Office. Under this paragraph, the Employment
Department may disclose an individual’s employment and wage information in response to  a federal
grand jury subpoena or for the purpose  of collecting civil and criminal judgments, including
restitution and special assessment fees. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be
used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be  paid
by the United States Attorney’s Office.
(3) The Employment Department may disclose information secured from employing units:
(a) To state agencies, federal agencies, local government  agencies, public universities listed in
ORS 352.002 and the  Oregon Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020, to the
extent necessary to properly carry out governmental planning, performance measurement, program
analysis, socioeconomic analysis or policy analysis  functions performed under applicable law. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by the agencies or universities in  any
manner that would identify individuals, claimants, employees or  employing units. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the  costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the agency or university requesting the information.
(b) As part of a  geographic information system. Points on a map may be used to represent eco-
nomic data, including the location, employment size class and industrial classification  of businesses
in Oregon. Information presented as part of a geographic information system  may not give specific
details regarding a business’s address, actual employment  or proprietary information. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this  paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(c) In accordance with ORS 657.673.
(4) The Employment Department may:
(a) Disclose information to public employees  in the performance of their duties under state or
federal laws relating to the payment of  unemployment insurance benefits, the provision of employ-
ment services and the provision of workforce and labor market information.
(b) At the  discretion of the Director of the Employment Department and subject to an intera-
gency agreement, disclose information  to public officials in the performance of their official duties
administering or enforcing laws within their authority  and to the agents or contractors of public
officials. The public official shall agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the  information by
the official’s agent or contractor.
(c) Disclose information pursuant to an informed consent, received from an employer  or claim-
ant, to disclose the information.
(d) Disclose  information to partners under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity
Act for the purpose of administering state workforce  programs under the Act. The information dis-
closed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information
under this paragraph shall be paid by the requesting partner.
(e) Disclose the names and  addresses of employing units to the Bureau of Labor and Industries
for the purpose of disseminating information to employing  units. The names and addresses disclosed
are confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed  under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use  of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the bureau.
(f) Disclose information to the  Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries for the
purpose of performing duties under ORS  279C.800 to 279C.870, 658.005 to 658.245 or 658.405 to
658.511 or ORS chapter 652, 653 or  659A. The information disclosed may include the names and
addresses of employers and  employees and payroll data of employers and employees. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information  disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the bureau.
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 11
(g) Disclose information required under ORS 657.660  (3) and (4) to the Public Employees Re-
tirement System for the purpose of  determining the eligibility of members of the retirement system
for disability under ORS chapters 238 and 238A. The information disclosed is  confidential and may
not be used  for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall
be paid by the Public Employees Retirement System.
(h) Disclose to the Oregon  Business Development Commission and the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department information required by the  commission and the department in performing their
duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630 to verify changes in employment levels following direct
employer  participation  in department programs or indirect participation through municipalities un-
der ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482. The information disclosed to the  commission and the department may
include an employer’s employment level, total subject wages payroll  and whole hours worked. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose. The commission
and the department may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employ-
ing unit or employee except to the extent  necessary to carry out the commission’s and the
department’s duties under ORS  285A.050 and 285B.630. If the information disclosed under this par-
agraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of  disclosing the in-
formation shall be paid by the commission or the Oregon Business Development Department.
(i) Disclose information to the Department of Revenue for the purpose of performing its duties
under ORS 293.250 or under the revenue and  tax laws of this state, or for the purpose of using in-
formation reported by employers and claimants to detect potential identity  theft or fraudulent
claims. The information disclosed may include  the names and addresses of employers and employees
and payroll data of employers and employees.  The information disclosed is confidential and may not
be disclosed by the Department of Revenue in any manner  that would identify an employing unit
or employee except to the extent necessary to carry  out the department’s duties under ORS 293.250
or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted to be filed under  the revenue
and tax laws administered by the department.  The Department of Revenue may not disclose any
information received to any private collection agency  or for any other purpose. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the  costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the Department of Revenue.
(j) Disclose information  to the Department of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose
of performing its duties under ORS chapters 654 and 656. The information disclosed may include the
name, address, number of employees and industrial classification code of an  employer and payroll
data of employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed
by the Department of Consumer and Business  Services in any manner that would identify an em-
ploying unit or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the  department’s duties under
ORS chapters  654 and 656, including administrative hearings and court proceedings in which the
Department of Consumer and Business Services is a party. If the information disclosed  under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(k) Disclose information to the  Construction Contractors Board for the purpose of performing
its duties under ORS chapter 701. The information disclosed  to the board may include the names
and addresses  of employers and status of their compliance with this chapter. If the information dis-
closed under this paragraph is not  prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the board.
(L) Disclose information  to the State Fire Marshal to assist the State Fire Marshal in carrying
out duties under ORS 453.307 to 453.414. The information  disclosed may include the name, address,
telephone number and industrial classification code of an employer. The information  disclosed is
confidential and may not be disclosed by the State Fire Marshal in any manner that would identify
an employing unit except to the extent necessary to carry out duties under  ORS 453.307 to 453.414.
If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by  the Department of the State
Fire Marshal.
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 12
(m) Disclose information to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission for the purpose of
performing the commission’s duties under ORS chapter 348 and  Title IV of the Higher Education
Act  of  1965. The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and em-
ployees and payroll data of  employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and
may not be disclosed by the commission in any manner  that would identify an employing unit or
employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under ORS  chapter
348 or Title IV of the Higher Education Act of  1965. If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for the  use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission.
(n) Disclose information to the Department of Transportation  to assist the Department of
Transportation in carrying out the duties of the Department of Transportation relating to collection
of delinquent and liquidated debts, including  taxes, under ORS 184.610 to 184.665, 184.670 to 184.733
and 805.263, ORS chapter 319 and the Oregon Vehicle Code. The information disclosed may  include
the names and addresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and  employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be disclosed by the Department of Transpor-
tation in any manner  that would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent nec-
essary to carry out the Department of Transportation’s duties relating to  collection of delinquent
and liquidated debts or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or  permitted to be
filed under the revenue and tax laws administered by  the Department of Transportation. The De-
partment of Transportation may not disclose any information received to any private  collection
agency or for any other purpose.  If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared
for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by
the Department of Transportation.
(o) Disclose information to the Department of Human Services and  the Oregon Health Authority
to assist the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority  in the collection of
debts that the  Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority are authorized by
law to collect. The information disclosed may include the names, addresses  and payroll data of em-
ployers and employees. The information disclosed  is confidential and may not be disclosed by the
Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority in a manner  that would identify an
employing unit or employee  except to the extent necessary for the collection of debts as described
in this paragraph. The Department  of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority may not
disclose information received under this paragraph to a private collection agency or use the infor-
mation for a purpose other  than the collection of debts as described in this paragraph. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the  Department of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority.
(p) Disclose to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  information required by the commission
in evaluating and measuring the  performance of [alcohol and drug prevention and treatment
programs] substance use prevention, substance use disorder treatment  and recovery support
services programs  under ORS  430.223 or the impact of the programs on employment. The infor-
mation disclosed to the commission may  include total subject wages payroll and whole hours
worked. The information  disclosed under this paragraph is confidential and may not be used for any
other purpose. The commission may not disclose the information in any manner that would  identify
an employing unit  or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties
under ORS 430.223. If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use  of
the Employment  Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the commission.
(q) Disclose to any person establishment level information  secured pursuant to this chapter from
federal, state and local government agencies, public universities  listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon
Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020. If  the information disclosed under
this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs  of disclosing
the information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 13
(r) Disclose to any person the industrial classification code assigned to an  employing unit. If the
information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the  use of the Employment Depart-
ment, the costs of disclosing  the information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(s) Disclose information to the State Treasurer useful for the purpose of performing the State
Treasurer’s  duties  under ORS 98.302 to 98.436, 98.992 and 116.253 and the role of an estate admin-
istrator under ORS 113.235. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used by the
State Treasurer for any other purpose. If the information  disclosed is not prepared for the use of the
Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the State Treas-
urer.
(5) The Employment Department  may make public all decisions of the Employment Appeals
Board.
(6) Any officer appointed by  or any employee of the Director of the Employment Department
who discloses confidential information, except with the authority of the director, pursuant  to rules
or as  otherwise required by law, may be disqualified from holding any appointment or employment
with the Employment Department.
(7) Any person or  any officer or employee of an entity to whom information is disclosed by the
Employment Department under this section who divulges or uses the information  for any purpose
other than that specified in the provision of law or agreement authorizing the use  or disclosure may
be disqualified from performing any service under contract or disqualified from holding  any ap-
pointment or employment with the state agency  that engaged or employed that person, officer or
employee. The Employment Department may immediately cancel or  modify any information sharing
agreement with an entity  when a person or an officer or employee of that entity discloses confi-
dential information, other than as specified in law or agreement.
SECTION 10.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2929 (HB 2929-A) Page 14